Hawaii statutes.
§572-27 Persons as sureties. All
persons, upon attaining their majority, and having the necessary property
qualifications as by law required, may act, serve, and be sureties on all bonds
and undertakings required under the laws of the State. [L 1923, c 9, §1; RL
1925, §2997; RL 1935, §4648; RL 1945, §12369; RL 1955, §325-4; HRS §573-4; ren
and am L 1987, c 46, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next